Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-418
Bonds; notice of issuance; publication; contents.

The board of directors shall give notice by publication once each week for three consecutive weeks of the proposed issue of bonds and the amount thereof.

Laws 1907, c. 153, § 15, p. 481;

Laws 1911, c. 145, § 1, p. 485;

R.S.1913, § 1882;

C.S.1922, § 1830;

C.S.1929, § 31-518;

R.S.1943, § 31-418.